Utah statutes.
53A-25b-307.    Educational Enrichment Program for Hearing and Visually
Impaired Students -- Funding for the program.
(1)  There is established the Educational Enrichment Program for Hearing and
Visually Impaired Students.
(2)  The purpose of the program is to provide opportunities that will, in a
family friendly environment, enhance the educational services required for
deaf, blind, or deafblind students.
(3)  The advisory council shall design and implement the program, subject to
the approval by the board.
(4)  The program shall be funded from the interest and dividends derived from
the permanent funds created for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind
pursuant to Section 12 of the Utah Enabling Act and distributed by the
director of the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration under
Section 53C-3-103.
